Alaska, session 34, HB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.30.170(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) An employer in the teachers' retirement system (AS 14.25) or the 06 Public Employees' Retirement System of Alaska (AS 39.35) that does not 07 participate in the federal social security system may become a participating 08 employer in the employee benefits program under AS 39.30.150 - 39.30.180; 09 however, an employee who is a member of the teachers' retirement system may 10 choose not to participate in the employee benefits program under AS 39.30.150 - 11 39.30.180 [, IF 12 (1) THE EMPLOYER PARTICIPATES AS AN EMPLOYER IN 13 THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM UNDER AS 39.35; AND 14 (2) THE EMPLOYER 01 (A) IS ELIGIBLE FOR MEMBERSHIP IN BUT HAS 02 NEVER ELECTED TO BECOME A MEMBER OF THE FEDERAL 03 SOCIAL SECURITY SYSTEM; OR 04 (B) WITHDRAWS FROM MEMBERSHIP IN THE 05 FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY SYSTEM]. 06 * Sec. 2. AS 39.30.180(3) is amended to read: 07 (3) "participating employer" means 08 (A) the State of Alaska; [AND] 09 (B) an employer who 10 (i) [WHO] is an employer as defined in AS 14.25.220, 11 14.25.590, AS 39.35.680, or 39.35.990; and 12 (ii) does not participate [WHO HAS NEVER 13 PARTICIPATED IN OR HAS WITHDRAWN FROM 14 PARTICIPATION] in the federal social security system [; AND 15 (iii) WHOSE PARTICIPATION IN THE 16 SUPPLEMENTAL EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PROGRAM HAS BEEN 17 APPROVED BY THE COMMISSIONER]. 18 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.